src-fst-morphology-stems-fin-acronyms.lexc.md
# Acronym classification
Acronyms are shortenings that inflect. They all have two inflection
patterns, one read letter by letter, and one word-by-word. They are separate
entries in this dictionary. For example OY will have singular illatives
_OY:hyn_ and _OY:öön_ for _yyhyn_ and _yhtiöön_ resp., although latter is
much rarer.
A big majority of popular acronyms in everyday use comes from English, and
the word-based inflection is virtually non-existent and would be very
confusing so there's no high priority for adding that.

The first classification for acronyms should be along the final letter, then
if the final word inflection is used, the class of that word.

* Acronyms examples:*
* *OY:hyn:* `OY+N+Sg+Ill`
* *OY:öön* `OY+N+Sg+Ill`

* `ADSL+N:ADSL  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Asymmetric Digital Subscriber Line
* `AKT+N:AKT  ACRO_EE  ;    `
* `API+N:API  ACRO_II  ;    ` Application Programming Interface
* `atk+N:atk  ACRO_OO  ;    ` automaattinen tekstinkäsittely
* `BBC+N:BBC  ACRO_EE  ;    ` British Broadcasting Company
* `BKT+N:BKT  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Brutto-Kansan-Tuote
* `BMW+N:BMW  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Bayerische Motor W
* `BSE+N:BSE  ACRO_EE  ;    ` 
* `cd+N:cd  ACRO_EE  ;      ` compact disc
* `CD+N:CD  ACRO_ÄKS  ;     ` Compact Disc
* `CD-R+N:CD-R  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Compact Disc Read-Only
* `CD-RW+N:CD-RW  ACRO_EE  ;` Compact Disc Read-Write
* `CIA+N:CIA  ACRO_AA  ;    ` Central Intelligence Agency
* `DDR+N:DDR  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Deutsches Democratische Republic
* `DE+N:DE  ACRO_EE  ;      ` 
* `DFI+N:DFI  ACRO_II  ;    `
* `DJ+N:DJ  ACRO_II  ;   ` Disc Jockey
* `dna+N:dna  ACRO_AA  ;    ` deoxyribonucleic acid
* `DNA+N:DNA  ACRO_AA  ;    ` Deoxyribo-Nucleic Acid
* `DPI+N:DPI  ACRO_II  ;    ` Dots Per Inch
* `DVD+N:DVD  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Digital Versatile Disc
* `EEC+N:EEC  ACRO_EE  ;    ` European Economy Council
* `EKP+N:EKP  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Euroopan Keskus-Pankki
* `EMU+N:EMU  ACRO_UU  ;    ` European Monetary Union
* `ETY+N:ETY  ACRO_YY  ;    ` Euroopan Turvallisuus-Yhteisö
* `EU+N:EU  ACRO_UU  ;      ` Euroopan Unioni
* `EY+N:EY  ACRO_YY  ;      ` Euroopan Yhteisö
* `FBI+N:FBI  ACRO_II  ;     ` Federal Bureau of Investigation
* `FIFA+N:FIFA  ACRO_AA  ;  ` Football
* `FTP+N:FTP  ACRO_EE  ;    ` File Transfer Protocol
* `GM+N:GM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;     ` General Motors
* `GPRS+N:GPRS  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` 
* `HIFK+N:HIFK  ACRO_OO  ;  ` Helsingfors 
* `HIV+N:HIV  ACRO_EE  ;    ` ... Immunodeficiency Virus
* `HJK+N:HJK  ACRO_OO  ;    ` Helsingin Jalkapallo-Klubi
* `HKL+N:HKL  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Helsingin Kaupungin Liikenne
* `HK+N:HK  ACRO_OO  ;      ` 
* `HS+N:HS  ACRO_ÄKS  ;     ` Helsingin Sanomat
* `HTML+N:HTML  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Hyper-Text Markup Language
* `HTTP+N:HTTP  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Hyper-Text Transfer Protocol
* `IBM+N:IBM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` International Business Machines
* `internet-tv+N:internet-tv  ACRO_EE  ; ` Tele-Visio
* `IP+N:IP  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Internet Protocol
* `IRC+N:IRC  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Internet Relay Chat
* `ISBN+N:ISBN  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` International Serial Book Number
* `IT+N:IT  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Informaatio-Teknologia
* `KHO+N:KHO  ACRO_OO  ; ` Korkein Hovi-Oikeus
* `KOP+N:KOP  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Kansallis-Osake-Pankki
* `lehtiö-pc+N:lehtiö-pc  ACRO_EE  ; ` Personal Computer
* `media-pc+N:media-pc  ACRO_EE  ; ` Personal Computer
* `MTV3+N:MTV3  ACRO_KOLME  ; ` Mainos-Tele-Visio
* `MTV+N:MTV  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Music TeleVision
* `NASA+N:NASA  ACRO_AA  ;    ` National Air and Space A
* `NATO+N:NATO  ACRO_OO  ;    ` North-Atlantic T Organisation
* `NBA+N:NBA  ACRO_AA  ;    ` National Basketball Association
* `netti-tv+N:netti-tv  ACRO_EE  ; ` Tele-visio
* `NHL+N:NHL  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` National Hockey League
* `NL+N:NL  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Neuvosto-Liitto
* `NPC+N:NPC  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Non-Player Character
* `OK+N:OK  ACRO_OO  ;    ` not pronounced in words
* `oyj+N:oyj  ACRO_II  ;  ` Julkinen Osake-Yhtiö (!)
* `oy+N:oy  ACRO_YY  ;    ` Osake-Yhtiö
* `OY+N:OY  ACRO_YY  ;    ` Osake-Yhtiö
* `paneeli-pc+N:paneeli-pc  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Personal Computer
* `PDF+N:PDF  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Portable Document Format
* `pH+N:pH  ACRO_OO  ;    ` per Hydrogen
* `pien-pc+N:pien-pc  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Personal Computer
* `pinta-WWW+N:pinta-WWW  ACRO_EE  ;  ` World Wide Web
* `PPI+N:PPI  ACRO_II  ;  ` Points Per Inch
* `PR+N:PR  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Public Relations
* `RNA+N:RNA  ACRO_AA  ;   ` Ribonucleic Acid
* `RSS+N:RSS  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` R
* `SAK+N:SAK  ACRO_OO  ;  ` Suomen Ammattiliittojen Keskusjärjestö
* `SDP+N:SDP  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Sosiali-Demokraattinen Puolue 
* `SGML+N:SGML  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Standardised General Markup Language
* `SKDL+N:SKDL  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Suomen Kristillis-Demokraattien Liitto
* `Skp+N:Skp  ACRO_EE  ; ` Suomen keskuspankki
* `SOK+N:SOK  ACRO_OO  ;  ` Suomen Osuus-Kauppa
* `SPR+N:SPR  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Suomen Punainen Risti
* `SQL+N:SQL  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Structured Query Language
* `STT+N:STT  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Suomen Tieto-Toimisto
* `SUL+N:SUL  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Suomen Urheilu-Liitto
* `TCP/IP+N:TCP/IP  ACRO_EE  ; ` Transmission Control Protocol / Internet Protocol
* `TCP+N:TCP  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Transmission Control Protocol
* `TI+N:TI  ACRO_II  ;    ` Texas Instruments
* `TM+N:TM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Tekniikan Maailma
* `TPS+N:TPS  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Turun Pallo-Seura
* `TS+N:TS  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Turun Sanomat
* `tv+N:tv  ACRO_EE  ;    ` tele-visio
* `URL+N:URL  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Uniform Resource Locator
* `USA+N:USA  ACRO_AA  ;  ` United States of America
* `VIP+N:VIP  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Very Important Person
* `VR+N:VR  ACRO_ÄKS  ;   ` Valtion Rautatiet
* `VTT+N:VTT  ACRO_EE  ;  ` 
* `VW+N:VW  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Volks Wagen
* `WAP+N:WAP  ACRO_EE  ;  ` Wireless Application Protocol
* `WC+N:WC  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Water Closet
* `WHO+N:WHO  ACRO_OO  ;  ` World Health Organisation
* `WSOY+N:WSOY  ACRO_YY  ;   ` Werner-Söderström Osake-Yhtiö
* `WTO+N:WTO  ACRO_OO  ;  ` World Trade Organisation
* `WWF+N:WWF  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` World Wildlife Foundation
* `www+N:www  ACRO_EE  ;  ` world wide web
* `WWW+N:WWW  ACRO_EE  ;  ` World Wide Web
* `XML+N:XML  ACRO_ÄKS  ; ` Extensible Markup Language
* `Y2K+N:Y2K  ACRO_OO  ;  ` not spelled out
* `YK+N:YK  ACRO_OO  ;    ` Yhdistyneet Kansakunnat
* `YMP+N:YMP  ACRO_EE  ;  ` 
* `YT+N:YT  ACRO_EE  ;    ` Yhteistyö?
* `ÄO+N:ÄO  ACRO_OO  ;    ` Älykkyysosamäärä

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/fin-acronyms.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/fin-acronyms.lexc)</small>

---
